ServerSide/Hunspell/quh_BO/quh_BO.aff
SFX G   0     nkunasina   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nchejkunasina [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykukunasina [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykichejkunasina [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nkukunasina [aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykunasina [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykikunasina [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkunasina [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninchejkunasina [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykukunasina [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykichejkunasina [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkukunasina [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     spasina     [aeiou]
SFX G   0     spatasina   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     kunajsina   .
SFX G   0     kunajpasina .
SFX G   0     kunajtasina .
SFX G   0     kunajpatasina .
SFX G   0     sniykama    [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykikama  [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninkama    [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninchejkama [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykukama  [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykichejkama [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninkukama  [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykunakama   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykikunakama [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nkunakama   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nchejkunakama [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykukunakama [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykichejkunakama [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nkukunakama [aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykunakama [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykikunakama [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkunakama [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninchejkunakama [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykukunakama [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykichejkunakama [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkukunakama [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     spakama     [aeiou]
SFX G   0     spatakama   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     kunajkama   .
SFX G   0     kunajpakama .
SFX G   0     kunajtakama .
SFX G   0     kunajpatakama .
SFX G   0     sniyjawa    [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykijawa  [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninjawa    [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninchejjawa [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykujawa  [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykichejjawa [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninkujawa  [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykunajawa   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykikunajawa [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nkunajawa   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nchejkunajawa [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykukunajawa [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykichejkunajawa [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nkukunajawa [aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykunajawa [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykikunajawa [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkunajawa [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninchejkunajawa [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykukunajawa [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykichejkunajawa [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkukunajawa [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     spajawa     [aeiou]
SFX G   0     spatajawa   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     kunajjawa   .
SFX G   0     kunajpajawa .
SFX G   0     kunajtajawa .
SFX G   0     kunajpatajawa .
SFX G   0     sniypacha   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykipacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninpacha   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninchejpacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykupacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykichejpacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninkupacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykunapacha  [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykikunapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nkunapacha  [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nchejkunapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykukunapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykichejkunapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nkukunapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykunapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykikunapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkunapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninchejkunapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykukunapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykichejkunapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkukunapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     spapacha    [aeiou]
SFX G   0     spatapacha  [aeiou]
SFX G   0     kunajpacha  .
SFX G   0     kunajpapacha .
SFX G   0     kunajtapacha .
SFX G   0     kunajpatapacha .
SFX G   0     sniymá      [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykimá    [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninmá      [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninchejmá  [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykumá    [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykichejmá [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninkumá    [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykunamá     [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykikunamá   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nkunamá     [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nchejkunamá [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykukunamá   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykichejkunamá [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nkukunamá   [aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykunamá   [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykikunamá [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkunamá   [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninchejkunamá [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykukunamá [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykichejkunamá [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkukunamá [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     spamá       [aeiou]
SFX G   0     spatamá     [aeiou]
SFX G   0     kunajmá     .
SFX G   0     kunajpamá   .
SFX G   0     kunajtamá   .
SFX G   0     kunajpatamá .
SFX G   0     sniymantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykimantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninmantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninchejmantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykumantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sniykichejmantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     sninkumantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykunamantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykikunamantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nkunamantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nchejkunamantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykukunamantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     ykichejkunamantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     nkukunamantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykunamantapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykikunamantapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkunamantapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninchejkunamantapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykukunamantapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     niykichejkunamantapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     ninkukunamantapacha [^aeiou]
SFX G   0     spamantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     spatamantapacha [aeiou]
SFX G   0     kunajmantapacha .
SFX G   0     kunajpamantapacha .
SFX G   0     kunajtamantapacha .
SFX G   0     kunajpatamantapacha .
