ServerSide/Hunspell/quh_BO/quh_BO.dic
Apolinar/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Bonilla/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Chipaya/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
Esteban/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Fernando/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Gustavo/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Isaac/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Julian/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Lucio/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Mexico/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Patricio/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Raul/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Sanchez/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Toledo/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Walter/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
achej/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ajsu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
allikaj/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
amataj/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
anchhi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
antawara/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
apatara/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
aqajllu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
arawej/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
as/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
atejlla/aAtTgGhHyYzZwWoOjJnNpPu
awaku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
awqapurej/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ayka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
aysana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
boliviana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'allana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'aqe/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'awjra/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'illawa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'irma/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'uankira/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'usaj/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'war/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chajrayapuy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chakitajlla/aAtTgGhHyYzZwWoOjJnNpPu
chanrara/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chawcha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chhajlla/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chhaqe/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chhulla/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chijniy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chinkana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chiririnka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chojchak'utu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chukichinchay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chuntaruru/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chuwi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
illapachaw/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
inkill/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
intinpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
iru/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
itana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jach'akalla/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jamawt'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
janllariy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jaq'arwa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jatunmuchuy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jawkaypata/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jayunakuy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jiq'e/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
juku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jurk'uta/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'acha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'allka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'atki/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'illka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'iskikay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'ullku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'uychi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kachisapa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kallpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kanejy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
karminqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kawna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
khanki/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
khirkinchu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
khuyuna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kilo/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOnNpPu
kirpana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kuchuch/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kullana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kuntur/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kuskiypacha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
laqho/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llakachuki/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llanpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llapsak'ullu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llijmay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
lliuqelliuqe/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llullana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llust'i/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mach'ay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
majma/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mamakay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mant'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
marañun/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mat'i/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mayuura/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
milla/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
miray/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mitamasi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
muchuchiy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
munana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
musqoy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
nanaymayu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
nisqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
p'achwarkhuna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
p'asña/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
p'isqo/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
p'unchaw/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pakakuna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
paqarijch'aska/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
payajmaman/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
phina/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pichara/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pirwa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
puma/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
putuku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
q'awchirumi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
q'eririnka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qachayuyu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qaparuna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qawa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qewa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qhari/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qhespi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qollpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qoqoway/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
rahukunka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
rawkha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
rumichajra/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ruwana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sank'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sasachay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sijsi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sinru/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sirpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sonqochinkay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sunqop'itiy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
suyana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
t'ayqo/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
t'irana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
t'usu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tanpurqo/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tatamama/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
thulltukay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
timpnakuu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tojlla/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tupaj/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ujya/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
unkucha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ushpha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
uyni/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wachariy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wallata/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wankarkamawyj/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
waqaylli/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
warpi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
watu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
waynakay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wijsaallichaj/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wira/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
yajtuy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
yarqay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
yuqo/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ñijwin/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
